Nebraska, session 109, LB669.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB669 LB669
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 28-325, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
28-325 The Legislature hereby finds and declares:
(1) That the following provisions were motivated by the legislative
intrusion of the United States Supreme Court by virtue of its decision
removing the protection afforded the unborn. Sections 28-325 to 28-345
are in no way to be construed as legislatively encouraging abortions at
any stage of unborn human development, but are rather an expression of
the will of the people of the State of Nebraska and the members of the
Legislature to provide protection for the life of the unborn child
whenever possible;
(2) That the members of the Legislature expressly deplore the
destruction of the unborn human lives which has and will occur in
Nebraska as a consequence of the United States Supreme Court's decision
on abortion of January 22, 1973;
(3) That it is in the interest of the people of the State of
Nebraska that every precaution be taken to insure the protection of every
viable unborn child being aborted, and every precaution be taken to
provide life-supportive procedures to insure the unborn child its
continued life after its abortion;
(4) That currently this state is prevented from providing adequate
legal remedies to protect the life, health, and welfare of pregnant women
and unborn human life;
(4) (5) That it is in the interest of the people of the State of
Nebraska to maintain accurate statistical data to aid in providing proper
maternal health regulations and education;
(5) (6) That the existing standard of care for preabortion screening
and counseling is not always adequate to protect the health needs of
women;
(6) (7) That clarifying the minimum standard of care for preabortion
screening and counseling in statute is a practical means of protecting
-2-

LB669 LB669
2025 2025
the well-being of women and may better ensure that abortion doctors are
sufficiently aware of each patient's risk profile so they may give each
patient a well-informed medical opinion regarding her unique case; and
(7) (8) That providing right to redress against nonphysicians who
perform illegal abortions or encourage self-abortions is an important
means of protecting women's health; and .
(8) That abundant research indicates many pregnant women feel
coerced or pressured into abortion, and that it is in the interest of the
people and the State of Nebraska that these women be given an opportunity
to report coercion, abuse, and human trafficking.
Sec. 2. Section 28-326, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
28-326 For purposes of sections 28-325 to 28-345 and 28-347 to
28-347.06, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) Abortion means the use or prescription of any instrument,
medicine, drug, or other substance or device intentionally to terminate
the pregnancy of a woman known to be pregnant with an intention other
than to increase the probability of a live birth, to preserve the life or
health of the child after live birth, or to remove a dead unborn child,
and which causes the premature termination of the pregnancy;
(2) Complications associated with abortion means any adverse
physical, psychological, or emotional reaction that is reported in a
peer-reviewed journal to be statistically associated with abortion such
that there is less than a five percent probability (P &lt; .05) that the
result is due to chance;
(2) (3) Conception means the fecundation of the ovum by the
spermatozoa;
(3)(a) (4)(a) Dismemberment abortion means an abortion in which,
with the purpose of causing the death of an unborn child, a person
purposely dismembers the body of a living unborn child and extracts him
or her one piece at a time from the uterus through use of clamps,
-3-

LB669 LB669
2025 2025
grasping forceps, tongs, scissors, or similar instruments that, through
the convergence of two rigid levers, slice, crush, or grasp a portion of
the unborn child's body to cut or rip it off.
(b) Dismemberment abortion does not include:
(i) An abortion in which suction is used to dismember the body of an
unborn child by sucking fetal parts into a collection container; or
(ii) The use of instruments or suction to remove the remains of an
unborn child who has already died;
(4) (5) Emergency situation means that condition which, on the basis
of the physician's good faith clinical judgment, so complicates the
medical condition of a pregnant woman as to necessitate the immediate
abortion of her pregnancy to avert her death or for which a delay will
create serious risk of substantial impairment of a major bodily function;
(5) (6) Hospital means those institutions licensed by the Department
of Health and Human Services pursuant to the Health Care Facility
Licensure Act;
(7) Negligible risk means a risk that a reasonable person would
consider to be immaterial to a decision to undergo an elective medical
procedure;
(6) (8) Partial-birth abortion means an abortion procedure in which
the person performing the abortion partially delivers vaginally a living
unborn child before killing the unborn child and completing the delivery.
For purposes of this subdivision, the term partially delivers vaginally a
living unborn child before killing the unborn child means deliberately
and intentionally delivering into the vagina a living unborn child, or a
substantial portion thereof, for the purpose of performing a procedure
that the person performing such procedure knows will kill the unborn
child and does kill the unborn child;
(7) (9) Physician means any person licensed to practice medicine in
this state as provided in the Uniform Credentialing Act;
(8) (10) Pregnant means that condition of a woman who has unborn
-4-

LB669 LB669
2025 2025
human life within her as the result of conception;
(9) (11) Probable gestational age of the unborn child means what
will with reasonable probability, in the judgment of the physician, be
the gestational age of the unborn child at the time the abortion is
planned to be performed;
(12) Risk factor associated with abortion means any factor,
including any physical, psychological, emotional, demographic, or
situational factor, for which there is a statistical association with one
or more complications associated with abortion such that there is less
than a five percent probability (P &lt; .05) that such statistical
association is due to chance. Such information on risk factors shall have
been published in any peer-reviewed journals indexed by the United States
National Library of Medicine's search services (PubMed or MEDLINE) or in
any journal included in the Thomson Reuters Scientific Master Journal
List not less than twelve months prior to the day preabortion screening
was provided;
(10) (13) Self-induced abortion means any abortion or menstrual
extraction attempted or completed by a pregnant woman on her own body;
(11) (14) Ultrasound means the use of ultrasonic waves for
diagnostic or therapeutic purposes, specifically to monitor an unborn
child;
(12) (15) Viability means that stage of human development when the
unborn child is potentially able to live more than merely momentarily
outside the womb of the mother by natural or artificial means; and
(13) (16) Woman means any female human being whether or not she has
reached the age of majority.
Sec. 3. Section 28-327, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
28-327 No abortion shall be performed except with the voluntary and
informed consent of the woman upon whom the abortion is to be performed.
Except in the case of an emergency situation, consent to an abortion is
-5-

LB669 LB669
2025 2025
voluntary and informed only if:
(1) The woman is told the following by the physician who is to
perform the abortion, by the referring physician, or by a physician
assistant or registered nurse licensed under the Uniform Credentialing
Act who is an agent of either physician, at least twenty-four hours
before the abortion:
(a) The particular medical risks associated with the particular
abortion procedure to be employed including, when medically accurate, the
risks of infection, hemorrhage, perforated uterus, danger to subsequent
pregnancies, and infertility;
(b) The probable gestational age of the unborn child at the time the
abortion is to be performed;
(c) The medical risks associated with carrying her child to term;
(d) That she cannot be forced or required by anyone to have an
abortion and is free to withhold or withdraw her consent for an abortion;
and
(e) Research indicates that mifepristone alone is not always
effective in ending a pregnancy. You may still have a viable pregnancy
after taking mifepristone. If you change your mind and want to continue
your pregnancy after taking mifepristone, information on finding
immediate medical assistance is available on the website of the
Department of Health and Human Services.
The person providing the information specified in this subdivision
to the person upon whom the abortion is to be performed shall be deemed
qualified to so advise and provide such information only if, at a
minimum, he or she has had training in each of the following subjects:
Sexual and reproductive health; abortion technology; contraceptive
technology; short-term counseling skills; community resources and
referral; and informed consent. The physician or the physician's agent
may provide this information by telephone without conducting a physical
examination or tests of the patient, in which case the information
-6-

LB669 LB669
2025 2025
required to be supplied may be based on facts supplied by the patient and
whatever other relevant information is reasonably available to the
physician or the physician's agent;
(2) The woman is informed by telephone or in person, by the
physician who is to perform the abortion, by the referring physician, or
by an agent of either physician, at least twenty-four hours before the
abortion:
(a) The name of the physician who will perform the abortion;
(b) That medical assistance benefits may be available for prenatal
care, childbirth, and neonatal care;
(c) That the father is liable to assist in the support of her child,
even in instances in which the father has offered to pay for the
abortion;
(d) That she has the right to review the printed materials described
in section 28-327.01. The physician or his or her agent shall orally
inform the woman that the materials have been provided by the Department
of Health and Human Services and that they describe the unborn child,
list agencies which offer alternatives to abortion, and include
information on finding immediate medical assistance if she changes her
mind after taking mifepristone and wants to continue her pregnancy. If
the woman chooses to review the materials, they shall either be given to
her at least twenty-four hours before the abortion or mailed to her at
least seventy-two hours before the abortion by certified mail, restricted
delivery to addressee, which means the postal employee can only deliver
the mail to the addressee. The physician and his or her agent may
disassociate themselves from the materials and may comment or refrain
from commenting on them as they choose; and
(e) That she has the right to request a comprehensive list, compiled
by the Department of Health and Human Services, of health care providers,
facilities, and clinics that offer to have ultrasounds performed by a
person at least as qualified as a registered nurse licensed under the
-7-

LB669 LB669
2025 2025
Uniform Credentialing Act, including and specifying those that offer to
perform such ultrasounds free of charge. The list shall be arranged
geographically and shall include the name, address, hours of operation,
and telephone number of each entity. If requested by the woman, the
physician who is to perform the abortion, the referring physician, or his
or her agent shall provide such a list as compiled by the department; and
(f) The telephone numbers for the national domestic violence hotline
and the national human trafficking hotline.
(3) If an ultrasound is used prior to the performance of an
abortion, the physician who is to perform the abortion, the referring
physician, or a physician assistant or registered nurse licensed under
the Uniform Credentialing Act who is an agent of either physician, or any
qualified agent of either physician, shall:
(a) Perform an ultrasound of the woman's unborn child of a quality
consistent with standard medical practice in the community at least one
hour prior to the performance of the abortion;
(b) Simultaneously display the ultrasound images so that the woman
may choose to view the ultrasound images or not view the ultrasound
images. The woman shall be informed that the ultrasound images will be
displayed so that she is able to view them. Nothing in this subdivision
shall be construed to require the woman to view the displayed ultrasound
images; and
(c) If the woman requests information about the displayed ultrasound
image, her questions shall be answered. If she requests a detailed,
simultaneous, medical description of the ultrasound image, one shall be
provided that includes the dimensions of the unborn child, the presence
of cardiac activity, if present and viewable, and the presence of
external members and internal organs, if present and viewable;
(4) At least one hour prior to the performance of an abortion, a
physician, psychiatrist, psychologist, mental health practitioner,
physician assistant, or registered nurse licensed under the Uniform
-8-

LB669 LB669
2025 2025
Credentialing Act; a social worker licensed under the Uniform
Credentialing Act or holding a multistate authorization to practice in
Nebraska under the Social Worker Licensure Compact; or a professional
counselor holding a privilege to practice in Nebraska under the Licensed
Professional Counselors Interstate Compact has, in a place and manner
that ensures the privacy of the pregnant woman:
(a) Asked and evaluated Evaluated the pregnant woman to identify if
she is being the pregnant woman had the perception of feeling pressured
or coerced into seeking or consenting to an abortion;
(b) Asked and evaluated the pregnant woman to identify if she is or
has been the victim of interpersonal or domestic violence;
(c) Asked and evaluated the pregnant woman to identify if she is or
has been the victim of human trafficking, including sex trafficking;
(d) In the event the pregnant woman discloses that she: (i) Is being
pressured or coerced into seeking or consenting to an abortion pursuant
to subdivision (4)(a) of this section; (ii) is or has been the victim of
interpersonal or domestic violence pursuant to subdivision (4)(b) of this
section; or (iii) is or has been the victim of human trafficking pursuant
to subdivision (4)(c) of this section, the licensed person to whom the
disclosure has been made has (A) provided the pregnant woman with the
telephone numbers for the national domestic violence hotline and the
national human trafficking hotline; and (B) offered the pregnant woman an
opportunity to make a confidential telephone call.
(b) Evaluated the pregnant woman to identify the presence of any
risk factors associated with abortion;
(e) (c) Informed the pregnant woman and the physician who is to
perform the abortion of the results of the evaluation in writing. The
written evaluation shall include, at a minimum, a checklist identifying
both the positive and negative results of the evaluation for each risk
factor associated with abortion and both the licensed person's written
certification and the woman's written certification that the pregnant
-9-

LB669 LB669
2025 2025
woman was asked the questions required by subdivisions (4)(a) through (c)
of this section and, if applicable, was given the telephone numbers for
the national domestic violence hotline and the national human trafficking
hotline and the opportunity to make a confidential telephone call
informed of the risk factors associated with abortion as discussed; and
(f) (d) Retained a copy of the written evaluation results in the
pregnant woman's permanent record;
(5) If any risk factors associated with abortion were identified,
the pregnant woman was informed of the following in such manner and
detail that a reasonable person would consider material to a decision of
undergoing an elective medical procedure:
(a) Each complication associated with each identified risk factor;
and
(b) Any quantifiable risk rates whenever such relevant data exists;
(6) The physician performing the abortion has formed a reasonable
medical judgment, documented in the permanent record, that:
(a) The preponderance of statistically validated medical studies
demonstrates that the physical, psychological, and familial risks
associated with abortion for patients with risk factors similar to the
patient's risk factors are negligible risks;
(b) Continuance of the pregnancy would involve risk of injury to the
physical or mental health of the pregnant woman greater than if the
pregnancy were terminated by induced abortion; or
(c) Continuance of the pregnancy would involve less risk of injury
to the physical or mental health of the pregnant woman than if the
pregnancy were terminated by an induced abortion;
(5) (7) The woman certifies in writing, prior to the abortion, that:
(a) The information described in subdivisions (1) and (2)(a), (b),
and (c) of this section has been furnished her;
(b) She has been informed of her right to review the information
referred to in subdivision (2)(d) of this section; and
-10-

LB669 LB669
2025 2025
(c) The requirements of subdivision (3) of this section have been
performed if an ultrasound is performed prior to the performance of the
abortion; and
(6) (8) Prior to the performance of the abortion, the physician who
is to perform the abortion or his or her agent receives a copy of the
written certification prescribed by subdivision (5) (7) of this section.
The physician or his or her agent shall retain a copy of the signed
certification form in the woman's medical record.
Sec. 4. Section 28-327.03, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
28-327.03 No civil liability for failure to comply with subdivision
(2)(d) of section 28-327 or that portion of subdivision (5) (7) of such
section requiring a written certification that the woman has been
informed of her right to review the information referred to in
subdivision (2)(d) of such section may be imposed unless the Department
of Health and Human Services has published and made available the printed
materials at the time the physician or his or her agent is required to
inform the woman of her right to review them.
Sec. 5. Section 28-327.04, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
28-327.04 Any person upon whom an abortion has been performed or
attempted in violation of section 28-327 or the parent or guardian of a
minor upon whom an abortion has been performed or attempted in violation
of such section shall have a right to maintain a civil cause of action
against the person who performed the abortion or attempted to perform the
abortion. A violation of subdivision (1), (2), (3), (5), or (6) (7), or
(8) of section 28-327 shall be prima facie evidence of professional
negligence. The written certifications prescribed by subdivisions (4) and
(5) (7) of section 28-327 signed by the person upon whom an abortion has
been performed or attempted shall constitute and create a rebuttable
presumption of full compliance with all provisions of section 28-327 in
-11-

LB669 LB669
2025 2025
favor of the physician who performed or attempted to perform the
abortion, the referring physician, or the agent of either physician. The
written certification shall be admissible as evidence in the cause of
action for professional negligence or in any criminal action. If judgment
is rendered in favor of the plaintiff in any such action, the court shall
also render judgment for a reasonable attorney's fee in favor of the
plaintiff against the defendant.
Sec. 6. Section 28-327.06, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
28-327.06 Any waiver of the evaluations, and notices, and
requirements provided for in subdivision (4) of section 28-327 is void
and unenforceable.
Sec. 7. Section 28-327.11, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
28-327.11 In a civil action involving section 28-327, the following
shall apply:
(1) In determining the liability of the physician and the validity
of the consent of a pregnant woman, the failure to comply with the
requirements of section 28-327 shall create a rebuttable presumption that
the pregnant woman would not have undergone the recommended abortion had
section 28-327 been complied with by the physician;
(2) The absence of physical injury shall not preclude an award of
noneconomic damages including pain, suffering, inconvenience, mental
suffering, emotional distress, psychological trauma, loss of society or
companionship, loss of consortium, injury to reputation, or humiliation
associated with the abortion;
(3) The fact that a physician does not perform elective abortions or
has not performed elective abortions in the past shall not automatically
disqualify such physician from being an expert witness. A licensed
obstetrician or family practitioner who regularly assists pregnant women
in resolving medical matters related to pregnancy may be qualified to
-12-

LB669 LB669
2025 2025
testify as an expert on the screening, counseling, management, and
treatment of pregnancies; and
(4) Any physician advertising services in this state shall be deemed
to be transacting business in this state pursuant to section 25-536 and
shall be subject to the provisions of section 28-327;
(5) It shall be an affirmative defense to an allegation of
inadequate disclosure under the requirements of section 28-327 that the
defendant omitted the contested information because statistically
validated surveys of the general population of women of reproductive age,
conducted within the three years before or after the contested abortion,
demonstrate that less than five percent of women would consider the
contested information to be relevant to an abortion decision; and
(4) (6) In addition to the other remedies available under the common
or statutory law of this state, a woman or her survivors shall have a
cause of action for reckless endangerment against any person, other than
a physician or pharmacist licensed under the Uniform Credentialing Act,
who attempts or completes an abortion on the pregnant woman or aids or
abets the commission of a self-induced abortion. Proof of injury shall
not be required to recover an award, including reasonable costs and
attorney's fees, for wrongful death under this subdivision.
Sec. 8. Section 28-327.12, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
28-327.12 (1) In the event that any portion of section 28-327 is
enjoined and subsequently upheld, the statute of limitations for filing a
civil suit under section 28-327 shall be tolled during the period for
which the injunction is pending and for two years thereafter.
(2) Nothing in section 28-327 shall be construed as defining a
standard of care for any medical procedure other than an induced
abortion.
(3) A violation of subdivision (4) , (5), or (6) of section 28-327
shall not provide grounds for any criminal action or disciplinary action
-13-

LB669 LB669
2025 2025
against or revocation of a license to practice medicine and surgery
pursuant to the Uniform Credentialing Act.
Sec. 9. Section 38-2021, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
38-2021 Unprofessional conduct means any departure from or failure
to conform to the standards of acceptable and prevailing practice of
medicine and surgery or the ethics of the profession, regardless of
whether a person, patient, or entity is injured, or conduct that is
likely to deceive or defraud the public or is detrimental to the public
interest, including, but not limited to:
(1) Performance by a physician of an abortion as defined in
subdivision (1) of section 28-326 under circumstances when he or she will
not be available for a period of at least forty-eight hours for
postoperative care unless such postoperative care is delegated to and
accepted by another physician;
(2) Performing an abortion upon a minor without having satisfied the
requirements of sections 71-6901 to 71-6911;
(3) The intentional and knowing performance of a partial-birth
abortion as defined in subdivision (6) (8) of section 28-326, unless such
procedure is necessary to save the life of the mother whose life is
endangered by a physical disorder, physical illness, or physical injury,
including a life-endangering physical condition caused by or arising from
the pregnancy itself;
(4) Performance by a physician of an abortion in violation of the
Pain-Capable Unborn Child Protection Act; and
(5) Violation of the Preborn Child Protection Act.
Sec. 10. Original sections 28-325, 28-327.03, 28-327.04, 28-327.06,
28-327.11, and 28-327.12, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, and
sections 28-326, 28-327, and 38-2021, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-14-